Utah statutes.
41-1a-416.   Original issue license plates -- Alternative stickers --
Rulemaking.
(1)  The owner of a motor vehicle that is a model year 1973 or older may apply
to the division for permission to display an original issue license plate of a
format and type issued by the state in the same year as the model year of the
vehicle.
(2)  The owner of a motor vehicle who desires to display original issue
license plates instead of license plates issued under Section 41-1a-401 shall:
(a)  complete an application on a form provided by the division;
(b)  supply and submit the original license plates that the owner desires to
display to the division for approval; and
(c)  pay the fees prescribed in Sections 41-1a-1206 and 41-1a-1211.
(3)  The division, prior to approval of an application under this section,
shall determine that the original issue license plates:
(a)  are of a format and type issued by the state for use on a motor vehicle
in this state;
(b)  have numbers and characters that are unique and do not conflict with
existing license plate series in this state;
(c)  are legible, durable, and otherwise in a condition that serves the
purposes of this chapter, except that original issue license plates are exempt
from the provision of Section 41-1a-401 regarding reflectorization and Section
41-1a-403 regarding legibility from 100 feet; and
(d)  are from the same year of issue as the model year of the motor vehicle on
which they are to be displayed.
(4)  An owner of a motor vehicle displaying original issue license plates
approved under this section is not exempt from any other requirement of this
chapter except as specified under this section.
(5) (a)  An owner of a motor vehicle currently registered in this state whose
original issue license plates are not approved by the division because of the
requirement in Subsection (3)(b) may apply to the division for a sticker to
allow the temporary display of the original issue license plates if:
(i)  the plates otherwise comply with this section;
(ii)  the plates are only displayed when the motor vehicle is used for
participating in motor vehicle club activities, exhibitions, tours, parades,
and similar activities and are not used for general daily transportation;
(iii)  the license plates and registration issued under this chapter for
normal use of the motor vehicle on the highways of this state are kept in the
motor vehicle and shown to a peace officer on request; and
(iv)  the sticker issued by the division under this subsection is properly
affixed to the face of the original issue license plate.
(b)  The sticker issued under this section shall be the size and form
customarily furnished by the division.
(6)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, the division may make rules for the implementation of this section.
